Utah statutes.
23-27-201.   Invasive species prohibited.
(1)  Except as authorized in this title or a board rule or order, a person may
not:
(a)  possess, import, export, ship, or transport a Dreissena mussel;
(b)  release, place, plant, or cause to be released, placed, or planted a
Dreissena mussel in a water body, facility, or water supply system; or
(c)  transport a conveyance or equipment that has been in an infested water
within the previous 30 days without decontaminating the conveyance or
equipment.
(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1):
(a)  is strictly liable;
(b)  is guilty of an infraction; and
(c)  shall reimburse the state for all costs associated with detaining,
quarantining, and decontaminating the conveyance or equipment.
(3)  A person who knowingly or intentionally violates Subsection (1) is guilty
of a class A misdemeanor.
